lexicon.lexc
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1nsiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1nsiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1nsiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1nsiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ensiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:V1nsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ensiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1nsiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ensiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1nsiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3PlProxPoss:ensiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1nsiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ensiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgProxPoss:V1ns EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ens EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3PlObvPoss:V1ning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3PlProxPoss:V1waang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3SgObvPoss:V1ning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc+3SgProxPoss:V1ng EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:V1nikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:V1waakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:V1nikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:V1kaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:ishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:ishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:ishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:ishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:ishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:ishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:ishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:ishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3PlObvPoss:ishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3PlProxPoss:ishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3SgObvPoss:ishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3PlProxPoss:ishiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg+3SgProxPoss:ish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3PlObvPoss:V1niw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1waan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1niw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1n EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl+3SgProxPoss:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3PlObvPoss:V1mining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3SgObvPoss:V1mining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Loc+3SgProxPoss:V1ming EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:V1minikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:V1minikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:V1mikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:V1mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:V1mishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:V1mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:V1mishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:V1mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:V1mishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:V1mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:V1mishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3PlObvPoss:V1mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1mishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1mishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1mishiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Sg+3SgProxPoss:V1mish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3PlObvPoss:V1miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1man EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:V1miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1mibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:V1mibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:V1miban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1miwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:V1m EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:V1niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1waabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:V1waabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:V1niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1waaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlObvPoss:V1niw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlProxPoss:V1waa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgObvPoss:V1niw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_aa                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary
0:%>%> NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_aa                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_aa                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_aa_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_aa_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_aa, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Stems
amikotawag NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
bagiwayaaneshkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
gichinik NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
giishkashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
giizhikashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
manoomini-mashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
manoominijiibik NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
mashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
namanjinik NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
namanjizid NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
ojiibik NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
omooday NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
opinii-mashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
zhooniyaa-mashkimod NI_Class=NI_aa_Boundary ;
